Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4486.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. As used in this act: (a) "Governing body" means the body in which the legislative powers of a municipality are vested. (b) "Municipality" means a county, city, village, or township. (c) "Natural gas infrastructure" means any equipment, facility, or building used in the transportation or distribution of natural gas. (d) "Propane" means a hydrocarbon whose chemical composition is predominantly C3H8, including liquefied petroleum gases, renewable propane, and any mixture of both liquefied petroleum gases and renewable propane. (e) "Propane infrastructure" means any equipment, facility, or building used in the transportation or distribution of propane. Sec. 3. Beginning on the effective date of this act, the governing body of a municipality shall not adopt or enforce an ordinance, resolution, or policy that prohibits any of the following: (a) The use of natural gas or propane in that municipality. (b) The installation of natural gas infrastructure or propane infrastructure in that municipality. Sec. 5. Any provision in an ordinance, resolution, or policy adopted by the governing body of a municipality on or after the effective date of this act that violates section 3 is void and unenforceable.